zh-CN: 赛车头套透气区域: 全头透气针织面料; 口鼻面板; 颈部透气; 无; 侧边面板; 头顶; 其他
sv: Ventilationszoner för racingbalaklava: Andningsaktiv stickning för hela huvudet; Mun-/näspanel; Nackventilation; Ingen; Sidopaneler; Ovanpå huvudet; Övrigt
ru: Вентиляционные зоны гоночной балаклавы: Дышащая ткань по всей голове; Панель для рта/носа; Вентиляция шеи; Нет; Боковые панели; Макушка; Другое
fi: Kypärämyssyjen tuuletuskohdat: Koko pään hengittävä neulos; Suu-/nenäpaneeli; Kaulan tuuletus; Ei mitään; Sivupaneelit; Pään laki; Muu
it: Zone di ventilazione del passamontagna da corsa: Tessuto traspirante su tutta la testa; Pannello per bocca/naso; Ventilazione sul collo; Nessuno; Pannelli laterali; Parte superiore della testa; Altro
pl: Strefy wentylacji kominiarki wyścigowej: Oddychająca dzianina na całej głowie; Panel na usta / nos; Wentylacja szyi; Brak; Panele boczne; Czubek głowy; Inne
es: Zonas de ventilación del pasamontañas de carreras: Tejido transpirable de cabeza completa; Panel de boca/nariz; Ventilación de cuello; Ninguna; Paneles laterales; Parte superior de la cabeza; Otra
tr: Yarış balaklavası havalandırma bölgeleri: Tam baş nefes alabilir örgü; Ağız/burun paneli; Boyun havalandırması; Yok; Yan paneller; Başın üst kısmı; Diğer
da: Ventilationszoner til racerbalaklava: Åndbar strik over hele hovedet; Mund-/næsepanel; Udluftning i nakken; Ingen; Sidepaneler; Overside af hovedet; Andet
sl-SI: Prezračevalna območja dirkalne podkape: Zračno pletenje po celi glavi; Vstavek za usta/nos; Zračenje na vratu; Brez; Stranski vstavki; Na vrhu glave; Drugo
hr-HR: Ventilacijske zone za trkaće balaklave: Prozračno pletivo za cijelu glavu; Ploča za usta/nos; Otvori za zrak na vratu; Nijedno; Bočne ploče; Na vrhu glave; Ostalo
ko: 레이싱 바라클라바 통풍 구역: 머리 전체 통기성 니트; 입/코 패널; 목 통풍구; 없음; 측면 패널; 정수리; 기타
lt-LT: Lenktyninės balaklavos ventiliacijos zonos: Orui laidus audinys visai galvai; Burnos / nosies sritis; Kaklo vėdinimas; Nėra; Šoninės sritys; Viršugalvis; Kita
ro-RO: Zone de ventilație pentru cagule de curse: Țesătură respirabilă pe tot capul; Panou pentru gură/nas; Ventilație la gât; Niciuna; Panouri laterale; Creștetul capului; Altele
bg-BG: Вентилационни зони за състезателна балаклава: Дишаща плетка за цялата глава; Панел за уста/нос; Вентилация на врата; Няма; Странични панели; Горна част на главата; Друго
cs: Ventilační zóny závodní kukly: Prodyšný úplet na celou hlavu; Panel na ústa/nos; Odvětrávání krku; Žádné; Boční panely; Temeno hlavy; Jiné
pt-BR: Balaclava de corrida zonas de ventilação: Malha respirável para cabeça toda; Painel para boca/nariz; Ventilação no pescoço; Nenhuma; Painéis laterais; Topo da cabeça; Outra
nl: Racebivakmuts ventilatiezones: Ademend weefsel volledig hoofd; Mond-/neuspaneel; Nekventilatie; Geen; Zijpanelen; Bovenkant hoofd; Overig
en: Racing balaclava ventilation zones: Full head breathable knit; Mouth/nose panel; Neck venting; None; Side panels; Top-of-head; Other
vi: Các khu vực thông gió của mũ trùm đầu đua xe: Vải dệt kim thoáng khí toàn đầu; Tấm che miệng/mũi; Lỗ thông gió ở cổ; Không có; Tấm hai bên; Đỉnh đầu; Khác
nb: Ventilasjonssoner for racingbalaklava: Pustende strikk på hele hodet; Munn-/nesepanel; Nakkeventilasjon; Ingen; Sidepaneler; Topp av hode; Annet
de: Belüftungszonen der Rennsturmhaube: Atmungsaktives Strickmaterial (ganzer Kopf); Mund-/Nasenbereich; Nackenbelüftung; Keine; Seiteneinsätze; Kopfoberseite; Sonstige
zh-TW: 賽車頭套通風區域: 全頭透氣針織; 嘴/鼻部位布料; 頸部通風; 無; 側邊布料; 頭頂部位; 其他
hu: Versenybalaklava szellőzőzónái: Teljes fejet fedő lélegző kötés; Száj/orr panel; Nyakszellőzés; Nincs; Oldalpanelek; Fejtető; Egyéb
sk-SK: Vetracie zóny pretekárskej kukly: Priedušný úplet na celú hlavu; Panel na ústa/nos; Odvetrávanie krku; Žiadne; Bočné panely; Vrchná časť hlavy; Iné
pt-PT: Zonas de ventilação da balaclava de corrida: Malha respirável em toda a cabeça; Painel para boca/nariz; Ventilação no pescoço; Nenhuma; Painéis laterais; Topo da cabeça; Outras
th: ช่องระบายอากาศของหมวกคลุมหน้าสำหรับแข่งรถ: ผ้าถักระบายอากาศทั้งศีรษะ; แผงปาก/จมูก; ช่องระบายอากาศบริเวณคอ; ไม่มี; แผงด้านข้าง; ส่วนบนของศีรษะ; อื่นๆ
ja: レーシングバラクラバの通気ゾーン: フルヘッド通気性ニット; 口/鼻パネル; ネック通気口; なし; サイドパネル; 頭頂部; その他
fr: Zones de ventilation de la cagoule de course: Tricot respirant sur toute la tête; Empiècement bouche/nez; Aération au cou; Aucune; Empiècements latéraux; Dessus de la tête; Autre
el: Ζώνες αερισμού αγωνιστικής μπαλακλάβας: Αναπνέουσα πλέξη για όλο το κεφάλι; Τμήμα για το στόμα/τη μύτη; Εξαερισμός λαιμού; Κανένα; Πλευρικά τμήματα; Στην κορυφή του κεφαλιού; Άλλο